California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
At any time after the establishment of two or more districts in any county, the board of supervisors may determine that any two or more of such districts which contain similar type lighting systems, whether or not they are contiguous, should be consolidated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 759.)
-------------------------------------------

19321.

The board shall fix a time and place for hearing the matter of consolidation of the districts and shall direct its clerk to publish a notice once a week for two successive weeks in a newspaper or newspapers circulated in each of the districts which it proposes to consolidate, and which the board deems most likely to give notice to the inhabitants of the districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 759.)
-------------------------------------------

19322.

The notice shall be headed “Notice of the proposed consolidation of ____ Highway Lighting District and ____ Highway Lighting District,” stating the names of the districts proposed to be consolidated and shall contain a statement of the time and place fixed by the board for hearing the matter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 759.)
-------------------------------------------

19323.

The notice shall state that it is proposed to consolidate into one district all of the territory within the named districts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 759.)
-------------------------------------------

19324.

At the time and place fixed for hearing or at any time to which the hearing may be continued, the board shall hear any person objecting to the consolidation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 759.)
-------------------------------------------

19325.

At the conclusion of the hearing the board may refuse to consolidate any of the districts or it may order the consolidation of any or all of the districts proposed to be consolidated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 759.)
-------------------------------------------

19326.

If the board determines to consolidate any of the districts it shall so declare by resolution stating the name by which the consolidated district shall be known.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 759.)
-------------------------------------------

19327.

The district resulting from the consolidation of two or more districts shall become liable for all outstanding liabilities of the districts consolidated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 759.)
-------------------------------------------

19328.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the district resulting from the consolidation of two or more districts shall assume all of the assets of the separate districts so consolidated and shall be entitled to all of the property tax revenues to which each of the separate districts so consolidated would have been entitled had the districts not been consolidated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. STREET LIGHTING FINANCIAL ASSISTANCE [19400. - 19402.]

19400.

From federal funds available for promoting public safety on the streets, the department may allocate to cities, cities and counties, and counties up to 50 percent of the cost of constructing, repairing, or improving street lighting facilities or up to 50 percent of the cost of contracting for street lighting services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1314.)
-------------------------------------------

19401.

In allocating funds for such purposes, the department shall give priority to those cities, cities and counties, and counties which submit in their requests for such funds the most convincing evidence that the proposed construction, repair, or improvement of street lighting facilities will aid in the reduction of the crime rate in the proposed lighted area.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1314.)
-------------------------------------------

19402.

The department shall adopt such rules and regulations as are necessary to implement the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1314.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 15. TREE PLANTING, LANDSCAPING, AND LIGHTING [22000. - 22679.]



PART 1. TREE PLANTING ACT OF 1931 [22000. - 22202.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [22000. - 22014.]

22000.

This part may be cited as the Tree Planting Act of 1931.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22001.

This part shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22002.

This part provides an alternative system for the planting, maintaining or removing of trees in cities, and the provisions of this part shall not apply to or affect any other provisions of this code. When any proceedings are commenced under this part, the provisions of this part and no other shall apply to all such proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22003.

Unless the particular provision or the context otherwise requires, the definitions and general provisions contained in this chapter shall govern the construction of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22004.

The city charter of any city adopting the provisions of this part shall control if any provision of this part is contrary to or in conflict with the charter, or if any provision of the charter requires any matter or thing specified in this part to be done in a particularly described manner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22005.

“City” includes all corporations organized and existing for municipal purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22006.

“Improvement” includes the planting, maintenance, or removal of trees, and any and all acts necessarily incident thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

22007.

“City council” and “council” include any body which by law is the legislative department of the government of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22008.

“Board” means a board of park commissioners, park department, or other similar municipal authority, whether composed of one or more individuals, having control of or jurisdiction over, or charged with the duty of superintending, directing, planting, maintaining, removing and otherwise caring for the parks, trees, shrubs and vegetation within a city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22009.

“Tree” includes all varieties of trees, shrubs and other ornamental vegetation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22010.

“Street” means all or any portion of territory within a city set apart and designated for the use of the public as a thoroughfare for travel, and includes the sidewalks, the center and the side plots thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22011.

“Lot line” means the boundary line separating that portion of a lot or parcel of land set apart for individual use and occupancy from the street.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22012.

“Maintain” or any of its variants when used in reference to trees includes clipping, spraying, fertilizing, irrigating, propping, treating for disease or injury, and other similar acts which promote the life, growth, health and beauty of trees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22013.

“Tax collector” includes any body, board, bureau or officer charged with the duty of collecting assessments for a city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22014.

No publication or notice other than that provided for in this part shall be necessary to give validity to any proceedings had hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Administration [22030. - 22035.]

22030.

The board in addition to the authority otherwise conferred upon it shall have full power and authority over the trees planted, or to be planted, pursuant to the provisions of this part, and may plant, maintain and remove such trees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22031.

The board may establish rules and regulations relating to the planting, maintenance and removal of the said trees and may recommend to the city council the enactment of any ordinances the board deems necessary to protect such trees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22032.

The board may appoint and employ a qualified person to be designated as city forester or by some similar title, to take charge of and direct, subject to the supervision and control of the board, all of the work authorized to be done under this part. The board may, if a city forester has not been appointed, fix the term of and compensation for the position of city forester, and determine the qualifications and fitness of applicants for the position and remove at pleasure persons so appointed and employed. If the method of employing and compensating a city forester is otherwise regulated by law or ordinance the law or the ordinance shall govern and control as to such matters.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22033.

The board may:

(a) Employ, or authorize the city forester to employ, as many assistants as it deems necessary to carry on the work.

(b) Fix the compensation of the assistants.

(c) Purchase the necessary machinery, tools and implements, for the proper conduct of the work, such purchases to be made in the manner provided by law or ordinance, and only out of funds available for expenditure by the board for that purpose.

(d) Incur such other expenses as it deems necessary for the conduct of the work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22034.

The board, or the city council, shall include in the annual budget of the board the amount of money necessary to meet the expenses of doing the work during the following fiscal year, including the compensation of the city forester and other employees, but excepting so much of the expense of doing the work as is assessable to abutting property, in accordance with the provisions of this part. The taxes levied for such purposes shall be in addition to any other taxes for park or street improvement purposes. If these expenditures are already provided for by law or by ordinance, then the law or the ordinance shall govern and control.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22035.

The city forester shall take charge of and direct, subject to the supervision and control of the board, all of the work authorized to be done by the board and may plant, maintain, and remove all trees over which the board is given power and authority by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Removal of Trees [22060. - 22062.]

22060.

The board may remove any tree or any part thereof which appears to be dead, is liable to fall, is dangerous or is an obstruction to public travel, whether or not the tree is on any private property and overhangs or projects into any street or is in any street, park, parkway or other public grounds of the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22061.

Except in the case of manifest public danger and immediate necessity, no such tree shall be wholly cut down or removed unless 10 days’ notice in writing is given to the owner, tenant, or occupant, or agent of the owner, tenant or occupant of the land upon which the tree is situate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22062.

If the owner, tenant, occupant, or agent, within seven days after the giving of the notice, files with the board his objections in writing to the removal, the tree shall not be cut down or removed unless the board gives the owner, tenant, occupant, or agent a reasonable opportunity to be heard and shall thereafter approve in writing the removal of the tree.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Undertaking the Improvement [22080. - 22096.]

22080.

When the board proposes the planting, maintenance or removal of any trees in any streets of the city, the city forester, under the direction of the board, shall present the proposal in writing to the city council. The proposal shall:

(a) Specify in detail the streets upon which the improvement is proposed to be made.

(b) Describe the general nature of the improvement.

(c) Give the estimated total cost of the improvement.

(d) Specify the kinds of trees to be planted, if any.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22081.

The proposal shall be accompanied by a diagram showing:

(a) The streets to be improved.

(b) The abutting lots or parcels of land and the front footage of each.

(c) The legal description of each such lot or parcel of land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22082.

Each lot or parcel of land shall be separately assessed in proportion to its frontage at a rate per front foot sufficient to cover that proportion of the total cost and expense of the work which is to be paid for by means of special assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22083.

A proceeding for the planting, maintenance, or removal of trees may also be instituted by a petition to the council of property owners whose property will be among that to be assessed to pay the cost of the proposed improvement. Upon such petition being filed the city forester shall file with the city council a diagram similar to the one accompanying a written proposal of the board for similar improvements, which shall describe the improvement proposed by the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22084.

The board or the city forester may plant, maintain, or remove any trees in any street of the city by private arrangement for reimbursement with the owner of any lot or parcel of land upon which or fronting upon which the trees are situate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22085.

The board or the city forester may expend any funds which it may have on hand to plant, maintain, or remove trees. The board or city forester may expend such funds if in its judgment the expenditures will not embarrass or affect the efficient discharge of its duties as defined by this part, or any other law or ordinance, and are advisable and for the best interests of the public. Any planting, maintenance, or removal done under the circumstances specified in this section shall not require the initiation of any proceedings as elsewhere specified in this part, or any other proceedings, or any formal action by the board or by the city council.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22086.

Before ordering any improvement specified in either the written proposal of the board or in the petition of property owners, the city council shall adopt a resolution of intention declaring its intention so to do, briefly describing the improvement, the streets which are to be improved, the general nature and the estimated costs and expenses thereof, the kinds of trees to be planted, if any, and fixing a time when the city council shall hear and pass upon protests against the improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22087.

If the proposal or the petition contains a provision for the maintenance of trees which are already planted or are proposed to be planted, the resolution shall provide for the maintenance of the trees for the period specified in the proposal, but in any event not to exceed five years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22088.

The city council may order in the resolution of intention, or thereafter, that all or a specified portion of the costs and expenses of the improvement shall be paid out of the treasury of the city from any funds which the city council may designate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22089.

Owners of property which will be assessed to pay the cost of the proposed improvement may protest against the improvement by filing their objections in writing with the city council at any time before the time fixed for the hearing thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22090.

The city council shall cause notice to be mailed and set the time and date for a public meeting and public hearing pursuant to Section 54954.6 of the Government Code. If new or increased assessments are proposed, the city council shall comply with the notice, protest, and hearing procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 262, Sec. 48.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22092.

If the owners of a majority of the front footage involved in the improvement object to the improvement, all further proceedings shall be terminated. If there is a majority protest the proceeding shall not be renewed for a period of six months, and then shall only be renewed by the adoption of another resolution of intention. If a new or increased assessment is proposed, the city council shall comply with the protest procedures in Section 53753 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 262, Sec. 49.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

22093.

On the date fixed by the resolution of intention for the hearing of protests, the city council shall proceed to hear and pass on all protests filed with it, and its decision thereon shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22094.

After the hearing, the city forester, under the direction and supervision of the board, shall abandon the improvement or proceed with it, according to the decision of the city council.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22095.

If the council decides to proceed with the improvement, it shall, by resolution order the improvement to be made according to the resolution of intention, or with such alterations or changes as it may deem best.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22096.

After deducting any contribution to be made by the city, the balance of the entire assessable cost of the improvement between the lot lines, in front of any lot or parcel of land abutting on a street which is to be improved, shall be chargeable to and assessed upon those lots or parcels of land.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 262, Sec. 50.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Performing the Work [22110. - 22110.]

22110.

The city forester, under the direction of the board, shall do, or cause to be done, all of the work ordered to be done by the city council under this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 170.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Levying and Collecting the Assessment [22130. - 22142.]

22130.

If the council orders the improvement to be made, it shall levy an assessment upon the lots or parcels of land specified in the diagram provided for in this part for the total amount required to pay for the improvement, less any sums allotted by the city council therefor in its resolution of intention or otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22131.

Upon the levying of the assessment, the clerk of the council shall transmit to the city tax collector the diagram and assessment upon which the levy is based.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22132.

The validity of any assessment levied under this part shall not be contested in any action or proceeding unless the action or proceeding is commenced within 30 days after the time the assessment is levied. Any appeal from a final judgment in such an action or proceeding must be perfected within 30 days after the entry of the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22133.

Upon the receipt of the diagram and assessment the tax collector shall record them in a suitable book to be kept by him for that purpose, and append thereto his certificate of the date of recording. The record shall be the assessment roll. From the date of recording all persons shall be deemed to have notice of the contents of the assessment roll.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22134.

Immediately upon the recording, the several assessments contained in the assessment roll shall become due and payable, and each of the assessments shall be a lien upon the property against which it is made, and shall only be discharged by payment of the assessment or by redemption of the land after sale for delinquency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------

22135.

The tax collector shall, upon the recording of the assessment, give notice thereof by publication for five days in a daily newspaper, published and circulated in the city, or by two insertions in a weekly newspaper so published and circulated. If there is no such newspaper, the notice shall be given by posting in three public places in the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22136.

The notice shall state that:

(a) The assessments have been recorded in the tax collector’s office.

(b) All sums assessed therein are due and payable immediately.

(c) The payment of the sums shall be made to him within 30 days after the date of the first publication or posting of notice, which date shall be stated in the notice.

(d) All assessments not paid before the expiration of the 30 days shall be delinquent, and thereupon 10 per cent of the amount of each such assessment shall be added thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22137.

When any assessment is paid, the tax collector shall mark opposite the assessment the word “paid,” with the date of the payment and shall give a receipt therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22138.

All assessments unpaid shall be delinquent at the expiration of a period of 30 days from the first publication or posting of the notice that the assessment is due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22139.

The tax collector shall, when any assessment is delinquent, mark opposite the assessment the word “delinquent,” and shall add 10 per cent to the amount of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22140.

As an alternative method for the collection of assessments levied under this part, the council, after the adoption of the resolution ordering the improvement, may order the assessment roll prepared by the city forester, showing the amount of the assessment against each lot or parcel of land, to be turned over to the assessor and the tax collector of the city, whereupon it shall be the duty of said officers to add the amount of said assessments to the next regular bill for taxes levied against the said lot or parcel of land for city purposes. Where city taxes are collected by the county officials, said assessment roll shall be delivered to the county auditor, who shall enter the amount thereof on the county assessment book opposite the description of the lot or parcel of land, and the amount shall be collected together with all other taxes thereon against the lot or parcel of land; provided, that said assessment roll shall be delivered to the county auditor before the date fixed by law for the delivery of the assessment books to the county board of equalization. Thereafter said amount shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner as city taxes are collected and shall be subject to the same penalties and interest and to the same procedure under foreclosure and sale, in case of delinquency, as provided for city taxes. All laws applicable to the levy, collection and enforcement of city taxes are hereby made applicable to such special assessment taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 237.)
-------------------------------------------

22141.

The city council shall have the power, in its discretion, to determine that the payment of such assessments may be made in annual installments, in any event not to exceed five, and that the payments of assessments so deferred shall bear interest on the unpaid balance at a rate to be determined by the city council, not to exceed 5 per cent per annum. All such determinations shall be expressed in the resolution of intention.

In the event that it is determined that such assessments may be paid in installments, the notice required in Section 22136 of this code shall so state, and the unpaid assessments shall not be delinquent until the expiration of a period of 30 days from the date upon which such installment was due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 257.)
-------------------------------------------

22142.

The lien, whether bonds issued to represent the assessment or otherwise, shall be subordinate to all fixed special assessment liens previously imposed upon the same property, but it shall have priority over all fixed special assessment liens which may thereafter be created against the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1465.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Sale and Redemption of Delinquent Property [22160. - 22178.]

22160.

The tax collector shall, within 30 days after the date of delinquency, begin the publication or posting of a notice that the lots or parcels of land upon which the assessments have not been paid will be sold. The publication shall be made by two consecutive insertions in a daily or weekly newspaper published and circulated in the city. If there is no such newspaper, the notice shall be given by posting in three public places in the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22161.

The date fixed for the sale shall be not less than five days, nor more than 10 days after either the last publication or the completion of posting of the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22162.

The notice shall contain a description of each lot or parcel of land delinquent, and opposite each description the name of the owner as shown by the assessment roll, and the amount of the assessment and costs due, including the cost of advertisement. The cost of advertisement shall not exceed the sum of fifty cents ($0.50) for each lot or parcel of land separately assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22163.

The notice shall contain a statement that unless each assessment which is delinquent, together with the penalties and costs thereon, is paid, the property upon which the assessment is a lien will be sold at public auction, at the time and place specified in the notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22164.

At any time after the delinquency and prior to the sale of any lots or parcels of land, any person may redeem the property by paying the delinquent assessment thereon, together with the penalties and costs and, if the payment is made after the first publication or posting of notice of sale, the cost of advertising.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22165.

At the time and place stated in the notice the tax collector shall proceed with the sale, commencing at the head of the list of the lots and parcels of land contained in the notice and continuing in the numerical order thereof until all the lots and parcels are sold. He may postpone or continue the sale from day to day until it is completed. He shall separately sell each lot or parcel of land, or so much thereof as may be necessary to realize the amount of the delinquent assessment which is a lien on the same, together with the penalties and costs, and fifty cents ($0.50) for a certificate of sale. If there is no other purchaser, the lot or parcel shall be struck off to the city as purchaser.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22166.

The tax collector shall issue for each sale an original and a duplicate certificate of sale, which shall refer to the proceedings, describe the lot or parcel sold, and give the name of the purchaser and the amount for which the sale was made. He shall deliver the original certificate to the purchaser, and he shall keep the duplicate on file in his office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22167.

At any time before the expiration of 12 months from the date of the sale, any property so sold may be redeemed by the payment to the tax collector of the amount for which it was sold, with an additional penalty of 20 per cent of that amount.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22168.

Upon redemption of any lot or parcel of land, the tax collector shall enter the fact and date of redemption upon the duplicate certificate of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22169.

The tax collector shall pay the redemption money to the person holding the original certificate of sale upon the surrender of the certificate and the execution of a receipt for the amount received.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22170.

If there has been no redemption of the property at any time after the expiration of 12 months from the date of sale, the tax collector shall, upon proper application being made therefor, execute to the purchaser, or his successor in interest a deed of the property sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22171.

The deed shall recite substantially the matters contained in the certificate of sale, any change of interest therein, and the fact that no person has redeemed the property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22172.

The applicant for a deed shall pay the tax collector one dollar ($1) for making the deed. If the city is the purchaser no charge shall be made for making the deed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22173.

At least 30 days before he applies for a deed, the purchaser or his successor in interest shall serve upon the owner of the property, and upon any occupant, a written notice setting forth:

(a) A description of the property.

(b) That the property has been sold for a delinquent assessment.

(c) The improvement for which the assessment was made.

(d) The amount for which the property was sold.

(e) The amount necessary to redeem at the time of giving the notice.

(f) The time when the purchaser or his successor in interest will apply to the tax collector for a deed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22174.

If the owner of the property can not with due diligence be found, the notice shall be posted in a conspicuous place upon the property at least 30 days before the time specified in the notice at which the application for a deed will be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22175.

The applicant for a deed shall file with the tax collector an affidavit or affidavits showing that notice of the application has been given, and if the notice was not served personally on the owner of the property, that due diligence was used to find the owner. The tax collector shall file the affidavit or affidavits in his office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22176.

The person redeeming shall, if he redeems after the filing of the affidavits and more than 11 months from the date of sale, pay, in addition to the other amounts required, three dollars ($3) for the service of notice and the making of the affidavits, which amount shall be paid over to the purchaser or his successor in interest in the same manner as other sums paid for redemption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22177.

No deed for any property sold for a delinquent assessment shall be executed until the purchaser or his successor in interest has complied with all the provisions of this chapter and filed with the tax collector the proper affidavits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22178.

The deed of the tax collector shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of all matters, recited therein, of the regularity of all proceedings prior to the execution thereof, and of title in the grantee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Improvement Funds [22200. - 22202.]

22200.

The funds collected by the tax collector under this part shall be paid by him, as fast as collected, to the city treasurer. The city treasurer shall place the funds in a special fund designated by the name of the improvement proceeding, and shall make payments out of that fund only for the purposes provided for in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22201.

Payments out of the special fund shall be made by the city treasurer to the board as funds are required for the prosecution and completion of the improvement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

22202.

To expedite the making of the improvement, the city council may at any time transfer into the special fund out of any money in the general fund, any sums which it may deem necessary. The sums so transferred shall be a loan to the special fund, and shall be repaid out of the proceeds of the assessments provided for in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. LANDSCAPING AND LIGHTING ACT OF 1972 [22500. - 22679.]



  CHAPTER 1. Introductory Provisions [22500. - 22574.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [22500. - 22509.]

22500.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the “Landscaping and Lighting Act of 1972.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 630.)
-------------------------------------------

22501.

This part shall apply to local agencies whose annual taxes are carried on the county assessment roll and are collected by the county, or an agency or entity created pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 6500) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code and made up solely of local agencies whose annual taxes are carried on the county assessment roll and are collected by the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 966, Sec. 12.)
-------------------------------------------

22502.

This part provides an alternative procedure for making the improvements herein authorized and shall not apply to or affect any other provisions of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 630.)
-------------------------------------------

22503.

An assessment district shall consist of all territory which, as determined by the legislative body, will be benefited by the improvements and is to be assessed to pay the costs thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 630.)
-------------------------------------------

22504.

An assessment district may consist of all or any part of the territory within the local agency and, in the case of a county, may consist of all or any part of the unincorporated territory of the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 630.)
-------------------------------------------

22505.

An assessment district may consist of contiguous or noncontinguous areas. The improvements in one area need not be of benefit to other areas.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 630.)
-------------------------------------------

22506.

The provisions of Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5115) of Part 3 of Division 7, pertaining to the extension of the work or the assessment district beyond the boundaries of a local agency, are by this reference incorporated in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 630.)
-------------------------------------------

22507.

Division 4 (commencing with Section 2800) and Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 3100) do not apply to this part or proceedings taken pursuant to this part, except that Division 4.5 (commencing with Section 3100) does apply to proceedings in which the legislative body determines to issue bonds or notes pursuant to Section 22662.5, and may be applied to any other proceedings pursuant to this part at the discretion of the legislative body.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1184, Sec. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

22508.

Any resolution, notice, report, diagram or assessment which is required to contain a description of the improvements, the boundaries of the assessment district or any zones therein, or the lines and dimensions of any lot or parcel of land may, for a full and detailed description thereof, refer to any plan or map which is on file with the clerk, the county auditor, or the county assessor and which is open to public inspection. The plan or map so referred to shall govern for all details of the description.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 630.)
-------------------------------------------

22509.

This part shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purpose. Any proceedings taken under this part and any assessment levied pursuant thereto shall not be invalidated for failure to comply with the provisions of this part if such failure does not substantially and adversely affect the rights of any person. All determinations made by the legislative body pursuant to this part shall be final and conclusive in the absence of fraud or prejudicial abuse of discretion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 630.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [22520. - 22540.]

22520.

The definitions contained in this article govern the construction of this part unless the context otherwise requires. The definition of a word or phrase applies to any variants thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 630.)
-------------------------------------------

22521.
